src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/gl/hyphenation/hyph_gl.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
3ï3a
a1a
e1e
o1o
1zo
zo2o
a1á
e1é
o1ó
2ai.
2au.
2ei.
2eu.
2oi.
2ou.
a1ia
a1ie
a1io
a1iá
e1ia
e1ie
e1io
e1iá
o1ia
o1ie
o1io
o1iá
u1ia
u1ie
u1io
u1iá
2ia.
2ie.
2io.
2iá.
1ñ
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1bá
1bé
1bí
1bó
1bú
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1cá
1cé
1cí
1có
1cú
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dá
1dé
1dí
1dó
1dú
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fá
1fé
1fí
1fó
1fú
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gá
1gé
1gí
1gó
1gú
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1há
1hé
1hí
1hó
1hú
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ká
1ké
1kí
1kó
1kú
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1lá
1lé
1lí
1ló
1lú
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1má
1mé
1mí
1mó
1mú
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ná
1né
1ní
1nó
1nú
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1pá
1pé
1pí
1pó
1pú
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1rá
1ré
1rí
1ró
1rú
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sá
1sé
1sí
1só
1sú
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1tá
1té
1tí
1tó
1tú
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vá
1vé
1ví
1vó
1vú
1xa
1xe
1xi
1xo
1xu
1xá
1xé
1xí
1xó
1xú
1za
1ze
1zi
1zu
1zá
1zé
1zí
1zó
1zú
1qu2
1c2h
2ch.
1g2h
2gh.
2k2h
1b2l
1b2r
1c2l
1c2r
1d2l
1d2r
1f2l
1f2r
1g2l
1g2r
1k2l
1k2r
1p2l
1p2r
2t2l
1t2r
1v2l
1v2r
2bl.
2br.
2cl.
2cr.
2dl.
2dr.
2fl.
2fr.
2gl.
2gr.
2kl.
2kr.
2pl.
2pr.
2tr.
2vl.
2vr.
1l4l
2ll.
1r2r
2rr.
b1p2t
c1p2t
d1p2t
l1p2t
m1p2t
n1p2t
r1p2t
s1p2t
t1p2t
x1p2t
b1c2t
c1c2t
d1c2t
l1c2t
m1c2t
n1c2t
r1c2t
s1c2t
t1c2t
x1c2t
b1c2n
c1c2n
d1c2n
l1c2n
m1c2n
n1c2n
r1c2n
s1c2n
t1c2n
x1c2n
b1p2s
c1p2s
d1p2s
l1p2s
m1p2s
n1p2s
r1p2s
s1p2s
t1p2s
x1p2s
b1m2n
c1m2n
d1m2n
l1m2n
m1m2n
n1m2n
r1m2n
s1m2n
t1m2n
x1m2n
b1g2n
c1g2n
d1g2n
l1g2n
m1g2n
n1g2n
r1g2n
s1g2n
t1g2n
x1g2n
b1f2t
c1f2t
d1f2t
l1f2t
m1f2t
n1f2t
r1f2t
s1f2t
t1f2t
x1f2t
b1p2n
c1p2n
d1p2n
l1p2n
m1p2n
n1p2n
r1p2n
s1p2n
t1p2n
x1p2n
b1c2z
c1c2z
d1c2z
l1c2z
m1c2z
n1c2z
r1c2z
s1c2z
t1c2z
x1c2z
b1t2s
c1t2s
d1t2s
l1t2s
m1t2s
n1t2s
r1t2s
s1t2s
t1t2s
x1t2s
san2c3t
plan2c3t
p1la
2pt.
2ct.
2cn.
2ps.
2mn.
2gn.
2ft.
2pn.
2cz.
2ts.
un2ha
2non.
3mente.
men1te
o2hib
o1hi
alde2h
al1de
4ca1ca4
4ca1go4
4ca1ga4
4cag2as.
4pu1ta4
4pu1to4
4meo.
4mea.
4meable.
mea1b2l
meab1le
4meabl2es.
4pei1do4
acto1a2
ac1to
acto1e2
acto1i2
acto1o2
acto1u2
acto1á2
acto1é2
acto1í2
acto1ó2
acto1ú2
afro1a2
a1f2r
af1ro
afro1e2
afro1i2
afro1o2
afro1u2
afro1á2
afro1é2
afro1í2
afro1ó2
afro1ú2
aero1a2
ae1ro
aero1e2
aero1i2
aero1o2
aero1u2
aero1á2
aero1é2
aero1í2
aero1ó2
aero1ú2
anfi1a2
an1fi
anfi1e2
anfi1i2
anfi1o2
anfi1u2
anfi1á2
anfi1é2
anfi1í2
anfi1ó2
anfi1ú2
anglo1a2
an1g2l
ang1lo
anglo1e2
anglo1i2
anglo1o2
anglo1u2
anglo1á2
anglo1é2
anglo1í2
anglo1ó2
anglo1ú2
.ante1a2
.an1te
.ante1e2
.ante1i2
.ante1o2
.ante1u2
.ante1á2
.ante1é2
.ante1í2
.ante1ó2
.ante1ú2
.anti1a2
.an1ti
.anti1e2
.anti1i2
.anti1o2
.anti1u2
.anti1á2
.anti1é2
.anti1í2
.anti1ó2
.anti1ú2
.arqu1i1a2
.ar1qu2
.arqu1i1e2
.arqui1i2
.arqu1i1o2
.arqui1u2
.arqu1i1á2
.arqui1é2
.arqui1í2
.arqui1ó2
.arqui1ú2
auto1a2
au1to
auto1e2
auto1i2
auto1o2
auto1u2
auto1á2
auto1é2
auto1í2
auto1ó2
auto1ú2
biblio1a2
bi1b2l
bib1li
biblio1e2
biblio1i2
biblio1o2
biblio1u2
biblio1á2
biblio1é2
biblio1í2
biblio1ó2
biblio1ú2
bio1a2
bio1e2
bio1i2
bio1o2
bio1u2
bio1á2
bio1é2
bio1í2
bio1ó2
bio1ú2
cardio1a2
car1di
cardio1e2
cardio1i2
cardio1o2
cardio1u2
cardio1á2
cardio1é2
cardio1í2
cardio1ó2
cardio1ú2
cefalo1a2
ce1fa
cefa1lo
cefalo1e2
cefalo1i2
cefalo1o2
cefalo1u2
cefalo1á2
cefalo1é2
cefalo1í2
cefalo1ó2
cefalo1ú2
ciclo1a2
ci1c2l
cic1lo
ciclo1e2
ciclo1i2
ciclo1o2
ciclo1u2
ciclo1á2
ciclo1é2
ciclo1í2
ciclo1ó2
ciclo1ú2
cito1a2
ci1to
cito1e2
cito1i2
cito1o2
cito1u2
cito1á2
cito1é2
cito1í2
cito1ó2
cito1ú2
.co1a2
.co1e2
.co1i2
.co1o2
.co1u2
.co1é2
.co1í2
.co1ó2
.co1ú2
contra1a2
con1t2r
cont1ra
contra1e2
contra1i2
contra1o2
contra1u2
contra1á2
contra1é2
contra1í2
contra1ó2
contra1ú2
cripto1a2
c1ri
crip1to
cripto1e2
cripto1i2
cripto1o2
cripto1u2
cripto1á2
cripto1é2
cripto1í2
cripto1ó2
cripto1ú2
cromo1a2
c1ro
cro1mo
cromo1e2
cromo1i2
cromo1o2
cromo1u2
cromo1á2
cromo1é2
cromo1í2
cromo1ó2
cromo1ú2
crono1a2
cro1no
crono1e2
crono1i2
crono1o2
crono1u2
crono1á2
crono1é2
crono1í2
crono1ó2
crono1ú2
deca1a2
de1ca
deca1e2
deca1i2
deca1o2
deca1u2
deca1á2
deca1é2
deca1í2
deca1ó2
deca1ú2
.deza1a2
.de1za
.deza1e2
.deza1i2
.deza1o2
.deza1u2
.deza1á2
.deza1é2
.deza1í2
.deza1ó2
.deza1ú2
dinamo1a2
di1na
dina1mo
dinamo1e2
dinamo1i2
dinamo1o2
dinamo1u2
dinamo1á2
dinamo1é2
dinamo1í2
dinamo1ó2
dinamo1ú2
ecano1a2
e1ca
eca1no
ecano1e2
ecano1i2
ecano1o2
ecano1u2
ecano1á2
ecano1é2
ecano1í2
ecano1ó2
ecano1ú2
eco1a2
e1co
eco1e2
eco1i2
eco1o2
eco1u2
eco1á2
eco1é2
eco1í2
eco1ó2
eco1ú2
electro1a2
e1le
elec1t2r
elect1ro
electro1e2
electro1i2
electro1o2
electro1u2
electro1á2
electro1é2
electro1í2
electro1ó2
electro1ú2
endo1a2
en1do
endo1e2
endo1i2
endo1o2
endo1u2
endo1á2
endo1é2
endo1í2
endo1ó2
endo1ú2
ento1a2
en1to
ento1e2
ento1i2
ento1o2
ento1u2
ento1á2
ento1é2
ento1í2
ento1ó2
ento1ú2
entre1a2
en1t2r
ent1re
entre1e2
entre1i2
entre1o2
entre1u2
entre1á2
entre1é2
entre1í2
entre1ó2
entre1ú2
euco1a2
eu1co
euco1e2
euco1i2
euco1o2
euco1u2
euco1á2
euco1é2
euco1í2
euco1ó2
euco1ú2
euro1a2
eu1ro
euro1e2
euro1i2
euro1o2
euro1u2
euro1á2
euro1é2
euro1í2
euro1ó2
euro1ú2
extra1a2
ex1t2r
ext1ra
extra1e2
extra1i2
extra1o2
extra1u2
extra1á2
extra1é2
extra1í2
extra1ó2
extra1ú2
fono1a2
fo1no
fono1e2
fono1i2
fono1o2
fono1u2
fono1á2
fono1é2
fono1í2
fono1ó2
fono1ú2
foto1a2
fo1to
foto1e2
foto1i2
foto1o2
foto1u2
foto1á2
foto1é2
foto1í2
foto1ó2
foto1ú2
franco1a2
f1ra
fran1co
franco1e2
franco1i2
franco1o2
franco1u2
franco1á2
franco1é2
franco1í2
franco1ó2
franco1ú2
gastro1a2
gas1t2r
gast1ro
gastro1e2
gastro1i2
gastro1o2
gastro1u2
gastro1á2
gastro1é2
gastro1í2
gastro1ó2
gastro1ú2
xeo1a2
xeo1e2
xeo1i2
xeo1o2
xeo1u2
xeo1á2
xeo1é2
xeo1í2
xeo1ó2
xeo1ú2
hecto1a2
hec1to
hecto1e2
hecto1i2
hecto1o2
hecto1u2
hecto1á2
hecto1é2
hecto1í2
hecto1ó2
hecto1ú2
helio1a2
he1li
helio1e2
helio1i2
helio1o2
helio1u2
helio1á2
helio1é2
helio1í2
helio1ó2
helio1ú2
hemato1a2
he1ma
hema1to
hemato1e2
hemato1i2
hemato1o2
hemato1u2
hemato1á2
hemato1é2
hemato1í2
hemato1ó2
hemato1ú2
hemi1a2
he1mi
hemi1e2
hemi1i2
hemi1o2
hemi1u2
hemi1á2
hemi1é2
hemi1í2
hemi1ó2
hemi1ú2
hexa1a2
he1xa
hexa1e2
hexa1i2
hexa1o2
hexa1u2
hexa1á2
hexa1é2
hexa1í2
hexa1ó2
hexa1ú2
hidro1a2
hi1d2r
hid1ro
hidro1e2
hidro1i2
hidro1o2
hidro1u2
hidro1á2
hidro1é2
hidro1í2
hidro1ó2
hidro1ú2
hipe2r1a2
hi1pe
hipe2r1e2
hipe2r1i2
hipe2r1o2
hipe2r1u2
hipe2r1á2
hipe2r1é2
hipe2r1í2
hipe2r1ó2
hipe2r1ú2
histo1a2
his1to
histo1e2
histo1i2
histo1o2
histo1u2
histo1á2
histo1é2
histo1í2
histo1ó2
histo1ú2
homeo1a2
ho1me
homeo1e2
homeo1i2
homeo1o2
homeo1u2
homeo1á2
homeo1é2
homeo1í2
homeo1ó2
homeo1ú2
homo1a2
ho1mo
homo1e2
homo1i2
homo1o2
homo1u2
homo1á2
homo1é2
homo1í2
homo1ó2
homo1ú2
ibero1a2
i1be
ibe1ro
ibero1e2
ibero1i2
ibero1o2
ibero1u2
ibero1á2
ibero1é2
ibero1í2
ibero1ó2
ibero1ú2
icono1a2
i1co
ico1no
icono1e2
icono1i2
icono1o2
icono1u2
icono1á2
icono1é2
icono1í2
icono1ó2
icono1ú2
.i1n1a2
.i1n1e2
.i1n1i2
.i1n1o2
.i1n1u2
.i1n1á2
.i1n1é2
.i1n1í2
.i1n1ó2
.i1n1ú2
.indo1a2
.in1do
.indo1e2
.indo1i2
.indo1o2
.indo1u2
.indo1á2
.indo1é2
.indo1í2
.indo1ó2
.indo1ú2
infra1a2
in1f2r
inf1ra
infra1e2
infra1i2
infra1o2
infra1u2
infra1á2
infra1é2
infra1í2
infra1ó2
infra1ú2
.inte2r1a2
.in1te
.inte2r1e2
.inte2r1i2
.inte2r1o2
.inte2r1u2
.inte2r1á2
.inte2r1é2
.inte2r1í2
.inte2r1ó2
.inte2r1ú2
intra1a2
in1t2r
int1ra
intra1e2
intra1i2
intra1o2
intra1u2
intra1á2
intra1é2
intra1í2
intra1ó2
intra1ú2
.iso1a2
.i1so
.iso1e2
.iso1i2
.iso1o2
.iso1u2
.iso1á2
.iso1é2
.iso1í2
.iso1ó2
.iso1ú2
kilo1a2
ki1lo
kilo1e2
kilo1i2
kilo1o2
kilo1u2
kilo1á2
kilo1é2
kilo1í2
kilo1ó2
kilo1ú2
macro1a2
ma1c2r
mac1ro
macro1e2
macro1i2
macro1o2
macro1u2
macro1á2
macro1é2
macro1í2
macro1ó2
macro1ú2
magneto1a2
mag1ne
magne1to
magneto1e2
magneto1i2
magneto1o2
magneto1u2
magneto1á2
magneto1é2
magneto1í2
magneto1ó2
magneto1ú2
maxi1a2
ma1xi
maxi1e2
maxi1i2
maxi1o2
maxi1u2
maxi1á2
maxi1é2
maxi1í2
maxi1ó2
maxi1ú2
mega1a2
me1ga
mega1e2
mega1i2
mega1o2
mega1u2
mega1á2
mega1é2
mega1í2
mega1ó2
mega1ú2
megalo1a2
mega1lo
megalo1e2
megalo1i2
megalo1o2
megalo1u2
megalo1á2
megalo1é2
megalo1í2
megalo1ó2
megalo1ú2
melano1a2
me1la
mela1no
melano1e2
melano1i2
melano1o2
melano1u2
melano1á2
melano1é2
melano1í2
melano1ó2
melano1ú2
micro1a2
mi1c2r
mic1ro
micro1e2
micro1i2
micro1o2
micro1u2
micro1á2
micro1é2
micro1í2
micro1ó2
micro1ú2
mili1a2
mi1li
mili1e2
mili1i2
mili1o2
mili1u2
mili1á2
mili1é2
mili1í2
mili1ó2
mili1ú2
mini1a2
mi1ni
mini1e2
mini1i2
mini1o2
mini1u2
mini1á2
mini1é2
mini1í2
mini1ó2
mini1ú2
multi1a2
mul1ti
multi1e2
multi1i2
multi1o2
multi1u2
multi1á2
multi1é2
multi1í2
multi1ó2
multi1ú2
miria1a2
mi1ri
miria1e2
miria1i2
miria1o2
miria1u2
miria1á2
miria1é2
miria1í2
miria1ó2
miria1ú2
mono1a2
mo1no
mono1e2
mono1i2
mono1o2
mono1u2
mono1á2
mono1é2
mono1í2
mono1ó2
mono1ú2
.nano1a2
.na1no
.nano1e2
.nano1i2
.nano1o2
.nano1u2
.nano1á2
.nano1é2
.nano1í2
.nano1ó2
.nano1ú2
necro1a2
ne1c2r
nec1ro
necro1e2
necro1i2
necro1o2
necro1u2
necro1á2
necro1é2
necro1í2
necro1ó2
necro1ú2
.neo1a2
.neo1e2
.neo1i2
.neo1o2
.neo1u2
.neo1á2
.neo1é2
.neo1í2
.neo1ó2
.neo1ú2
norte1a2
nor1te
norte1e2
norte1i2
norte1o2
norte1u2
norte1á2
norte1é2
norte1í2
norte1ó2
norte1ú2
octo1a2
oc1to
octo1e2
octo1i2
octo1o2
octo1u2
octo1á2
octo1é2
octo1í2
octo1ó2
octo1ú2
octa1a2
oc1ta
octa1e2
octa1i2
octa1o2
octa1u2
octa1á2
octa1é2
octa1í2
octa1ó2
octa1ú2
omni1a2
om1ni
omni1e2
omni1i2
omni1o2
omni1u2
omni1á2
omni1é2
omni1í2
omni1ó2
omni1ú2
paleo1a2
pa1le
paleo1e2
paleo1i2
paleo1o2
paleo1u2
paleo1á2
paleo1é2
paleo1í2
paleo1ó2
paleo1ú2
para1a2
pa1ra
para1e2
para1i2
para1o2
para1u2
para1á2
para1é2
para1í2
para1ó2
para1ú2
penta1a2
pen1ta
penta1e2
penta1i2
penta1o2
penta1u2
penta1á2
penta1é2
penta1í2
penta1ó2
penta1ú2
piezo1a2
pie1zo
piezo1e2
piezo1i2
piezo2o2
piezo1u2
piezo1á2
piezo1é2
piezo1í2
piezo1ó2
piezo1ú2
pluri1a2
p1lu
plu1ri
pluri1e2
pluri1i2
pluri1o2
pluri1u2
pluri1á2
pluri1é2
pluri1í2
pluri1ó2
pluri1ú2
poli1a2
po1li
poli1e2
poli1i2
poli1o2
poli1u2
poli1á2
poli1é2
poli1í2
poli1ó2
poli1ú2
.pos2t1a2
.pos2t1e2
.pos2t1i2
.pos2t1o2
.pos2t1u2
.pos2t1á2
.pos2t1é2
.pos2t1í2
.pos2t1ó2
.pos2t1ú2
.pre1a2
.p2r
.p1re
.pre1e2
.pre1i2
.pre1o2
.pre1u2
.pre1é2
.pre1í2
.pre1ó2
.pre1ú2
.pro1a2
.p1ro
.pro1e2
.pro1i2
.pro1o2
.pro1u2
.pro1á2
.pro1é2
.pro1í2
.pro1ó2
.pro1ú2
proto1a2
p1ro
pro1to
proto1e2
proto1i2
proto1o2
proto1u2
proto1á2
proto1é2
proto1í2
proto1ó2
proto1ú2
pseudo1a2
p1se
pseu1do
pseudo1e2
pseudo1i2
pseudo1o2
pseudo1u2
pseudo1á2
pseudo1é2
pseudo1í2
pseudo1ó2
pseudo1ú2
radio1a2
ra1di
radio1e2
radio1i2
radio1o2
radio1u2
radio1á2
radio1é2
radio1í2
radio1ó2
radio1ú2
.re1a2
.re1e2
.re1i2
.re1o2
.re1u2
.re1á2
.re1é2
.re1í2
.re1ó2
.re1ú2
retro1a2
re1t2r
ret1ro
retro1e2
retro1i2
retro1o2
retro1u2
retro1á2
retro1é2
retro1í2
retro1ó2
retro1ú2
sobre1a2
so1b2r
sob1re
sobre1e2
sobre1i2
sobre1o2
sobre1u2
sobre1á2
sobre1é2
sobre1í2
sobre1ó2
sobre1ú2
semi1a2
se1mi
semi1e2
semi1i2
semi1o2
semi1u2
semi1á2
semi1é2
semi1í2
semi1ó2
semi1ú2
socio1a2
so1ci
socio1e2
socio1i2
socio1o2
socio1u2
socio1á2
socio1é2
socio1í2
socio1ó2
socio1ú2
.su2b1a2
.su2b1e2
.su2b1o2
.su2b1u2
.su2b1á2
.su2b1é2
.su2b1ó2
.su2b1ú2
supe2r1a2
su1pe
supe2r1e2
supe2r1i2
supe2r1o2
supe2r1u2
supe2r1á2
supe2r1é2
supe2r1í2
supe2r1ó2
supe2r1ú2
supra1a2
su1p2r
sup1ra
supra1e2
supra1i2
supra1o2
supra1u2
supra1á2
supra1é2
supra1í2
supra1ó2
supra1ú2
.tele1a2
.te1le
.tele1e2
.tele1i2
.tele1o2
.tele1u2
.tele1á2
.tele1é2
.tele1í2
.tele1ó2
.tele1ú2
termo1a2
ter1mo
termo1e2
termo1i2
termo1o2
termo1u2
termo1á2
termo1é2
termo1í2
termo1ó2
termo1ú2
tetra1a2
te1t2r
tet1ra
tetra1e2
tetra1i2
tetra1o2
tetra1u2
tetra1á2
tetra1é2
tetra1í2
tetra1ó2
tetra1ú2
topo1a2
to1po
topo1e2
topo1i2
topo1o2
topo1u2
topo1á2
topo1é2
topo1í2
topo1ó2
topo1ú2
.tri1a2
.t2r
.t1ri
.tri1e2
.tri1i2
.tri1o2
.tri1u2
.tri1á2
.tri1é2
.tri1í2
.tri1ó2
.tri1ú2
tropo1a2
t1ro
tro1po
tropo1e2
tropo1i2
tropo1o2
tropo1u2
tropo1á2
tropo1é2
tropo1í2
tropo1ó2
tropo1ú2
ultra1a2
ul1t2r
ult1ra
ultra1e2
ultra1i2
ultra1o2
ultra1u2
ultra1á2
ultra1é2
ultra1í2
ultra1ó2
ultra1ú2
xeno1a2
xe1no
xeno1e2
xeno1i2
xeno1o2
xeno1u2
xeno1á2
xeno1é2
xeno1í2
xeno1ó2
xeno1ú2
hipe1r3r
.inte1r3r
supe1r3r
ti2o3qu2
ti2o3co
bi1u2ní
o2i3de
o2i3dal
oi1da
2al.
2a2is.
pe3r2e3mia
pe1re
pere1mi
libero2u3
li1be
libe1ro
atopo2u3
a1to
ato1po
enaxeno2u3
e1na
ena1xe
